src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/eo/hyphenation/hyph_eo.dic
abri1
abriko1
anekd2o3t
ane4k1d
anekdo1
antid2o3t
antido1
asimpt2o3t
asi4m1p
asimp1t
asimpto1
.az2o3t
.azo1
.bo3t
.bal2o3t
.balo1
bankr2o3t
ba4n1k
bankro1
.behem2o3t
.behe1
.behemo1
bergam2o3t
be1
be4r1g
berga1
bergamo1
.b1i3g2o3t
.bigo1
.bisk2o3t
.bis1k
.bisko1
bojk2o3t
bo4j1k
bojko1
.do3t
.dep2o3t
.depo1
.desp2o3t
.des1p
.despo1
.dev2o3t
.devo1
dorl2o3t
do4r1l
dorlo1
.ekz2o3t
.ekzo1
.er2o3t
.ero1
.erg2o3t
.e4r1g
.ergo1
.fo3t
.fag2o3t
.fago1
.fakt2o3t
.fa4k1t
.fakto1
.fl2o3t
fokstr2o3t
fo4k1s
fok1s2t2r
foks1t
fokstro1
.fr2o3t
.go3t
.gav2o3t
.gavo1
.golg2o3t
.go4l1g
.golgo1
.gr2o3t
.gro1
.herod2o3t
.hero1
.herodo1
hipn2o3t
hip1n
hipno1
hotent2o3t
hote1
hote4n1t
hotento1
.jo3t
.jo1
ĵab2o3t
ĵa1
ĵabo1
.ko3t
.kaĉal2o3t
.kaĉa1
.kaĉalo1
kalik2o3t
kali1
kaliko1
.kaml2o3t
.ka4m1l
.kamlo1
.kan2o3t
.kano1
.kap2o3t
.kapo1
.kar2o3t
.karo1
.koj2o3t
.kojo1
.komp2o3t
.kompo1
kompl2o3t
komplo1
kreoz2o3t
kre3o1
kreozo1
.ku3l
.kul2o3t
.kulo1
.kv2o3t
.kvo1
.alikv2o3t
.ali1
.alik1v
.alikvo1
.lo3t
.lo1
.lit2o3t
.lito1
.mar2o3t
.maro1
.mark2o3t
.ma4r1k
.marko1
marm2o3t
ma4r1m
marmo1
.mioz2o3t
.mi3o1
.miozo1
.no3t
nark2o3t
na4r1k
narko1
.po3t
perlam2o3t
pe4r1l
perla1
perlamo1
.pier2o3t
.pi3e1
.piero1
.pil2o3t
.pilo1
.piv2o3t
.pivo1
.pl2o3t
.plo1
poligl2o3t
poli1
poliglo1
.ro3t
.rab2o3t
.rabo1
reding2o3t
redi1
redi4n1g
redingo1
.rob2o3t
.robo1
.sab2o3t
.sabo1
sacerd2o3t
sace1
sace4r1d
sacerdo1
.sk2o3t
.sko1
.skler2o3t
.skle1
.sklero1
.skr2o3t
.skro1
.sp2o3t
.ŝo3t
.ŝo1
ŝevj2o3t
ŝe1
ŝe4v1j2
ŝevjo1
.terak2o3t
.tera1
.terako1
.tr2o3t
.tro1
.trik2o3t
.triko1
.vo3t
.zel2o3t
.zelo1
.po2r
.pos2t1
pos3t2ame4n1t
pos1t
posta1
postame1
pos3t2iljon
posti1
posti4l1j2
postiljo1
pos3t2u3l
postu1
.prete2r1
.prete1
.re2f3l2ig
.refli1
.re2spo4n1d
.res1p
.respo1
.re2spublik
.respu1
.respubli1
.re2storaci1
.res1t
.resto1
.restora1
.re2tro1
.sa2m
sam2a3r
sama1
.sa3m2u3m
.samu1
sa3m2uraj
samu1
samura1
.se3n2a3a1
.se3n2a3o1
sen2at
sena1
sen2eskal
sene1
senes1k
seneska1
.si4a1
.su3b2ute1
.subu1
.supe2r1
.supe1
.supe3ra.
.supera1
.supe3r2aj.
.supe3r2a2jn.
.supera4j1n
.supe3r2an.
.supe3re.
.supere1
.supe3ro.
.supero1
.supe3r2oj.
.supe3r2o2jn.
.supero4j1n
.supe3r2on.
.supe3r2as.
.supe3ri.
.superi1
.supe3ris.
.supe3r2os.
.supe3ru.
.su1peru1
.supe3r2us.
.ŝi4a1
tran3sc2e4n3d
tra4n1s
tran1s2c
transce1
tran3sep1t
transe1
tran3sistor
transi1
transis1t
transisto1
tran3sit
tran3s2pir
trans1p
transpi1
.tu2t1
.tu1
.tu3ta.
.tuta1
.tu3t2aj.
.tu3t2a2jn.
.tuta4j1n
.tu3t2an.
.tu3te.
.tute1
.tu3to.
.tuto1
.tu3t2oj.
.tu3t2o2jn.
.tuto4j1n
.tu3t2on.
1u2ja.
uja1
1u2j2aj.
1u2j2a2jn.
uja4j1n
1u2j2an.
1u2je.
uje1
1u2jo.
ujo1
1u2j2oj.
1u2j2o2jn.
ujo4j1n
1u2j2on.
1u2j1ig
uji1
1u2j1iĝ
.and2u3j
.a4n1d
.andu1
.halel2u3j
.hale1
.halelu1
1u2la.
ula1
1u2l2aj.
1u2l2a2jn.
ula4j1n
1u2l2an.
1u2le.
ule1
1u2lo.
ulo1
1u2l2oj.
1u2l2o2jn.
ulo4j1n
1u2l2on.
1e2m1u2l
e3m2u4l1s2
1u2l3ec
1u2l3ej
.akum2u3l
.akumu1
.ang2u3l
.angu1
.bu3l
.bet2u3l
.betu1
.bru3l
.bru1
.ejak2u3l
.eja1
.ejaku1
.fist2u3l
.fis1t
.fistu1
.fu3l
galin2u3l
gali1
galinu1
.gran2u3l
.granu1
.grat2u3l
.gratu1
.herk2u3l
.he4r1k
.herku1
hierod2u3l
hi3e1
hiero1
hierodu1
homunk2u3l
homu1
homu4n1k
homunku1
.inok2u3l
.ino1
.inoku1
.ins2u3l
.insu1
.instanb2u3l
.insta1
.insta4n1b
.instanbu1
.ju3l
.ĵu3l
.ĵu1
.kab2u3l
.kabu1
kalend2u3l
kalendu1
kalk2u3l
kalku1
kapit2u3l
kapitu1
kaps2u3l
kap1s
kapsu1
koag2u3l
ko3a1
koagu1
.kons2u3l
.konsu1
.kop2u3l
.kopu1
korpusk2u3l
ko4r1p
korpu1
korpus1k
korpusku1
.kum2u3l
.kumu1
.lu3l
.liverp2u3l
.live1
.live4r1p
.liverpu1
.mak2u3l
.maku1
manip2u3l
mani1
manipu1
matrik2u3l
matri1
matriku1
.mod2u3l
.modu1
molek2u3l
mole1
moleku1
.nu3l
.nu1
.neb2u3l
.nebu1
.ok2u3l
.oku1
.pu3l
.paĉ2u3l
.paĉu1
.pust2u3l
.pus1t
.pustu1
.ru3l
.ru1
.reg2u3l
.regu1
retik2u3l
reti1
retiku1
.ruk2u3l
.ruku1
.sim2u3l
.simu1
skrup2u3l
skru1
skrupu1
somnamb2u3l
so4m1n
somna1
somna4m1b
somnambu1
speg2u3l
spegu1
.spek2u3l
.spe1
.speku1
.stim2u3l
.stimu1
.tu3l
.tab2u3l
.tabu1
tarant2u3l
tara1
tara4n1t
tarantu1
.tru3l
.tru1
tuberk2u3l
tube1
tube4r1k
tuberku1
turb2u3l
turbu1
.ul2u3l
.ulu1
.uv2u3l
.uvu1
.vist2u3l
.vistu1
1u2l1ar
2u3l2ari1
2u3l2a4r1d
.pedik2u3l2ar
.pedi1
.pediku1
.pedikula1
1u2ma.
uma1
1u2m2aj.
1u2m2a2jn.
uma4j1n
1u2m2an.
1u2me.
ume1
1u2mo.
umo1
1u2m2oj.
1u2m2o2jn.
umo4j1n
1u2m2on.
1u2m2as.
1u2mi.
umi1
1u2mis.
1u2m2os.
1u2mu.
u1mu1
1u2m2us.
1u2m3ec
.alb2u3m
.a4l1b
.albu1
.bu3m
.opid2u3m
.opi1
.opidu1
referend2u3m
refe1
refere1
refere4n1d
referendu1
.fu3m
parf2u3m
pa4r1f
parfu1
.gu3m
.gu1
.kuk2u3m
.kuku1
.luk2u3m
.luku1
.lu3m
vol2u3m
volu1
.plu3m
.plu1
.stern2u3m
.ste1
.ste4r1n
.sternu1
.pu3m
.ru3m
.ser2u3m
.seru1
.gru3m
.gru1
.kvor2u3m
.kvoru1
.tru3m
.stru3m
.stru1
.su3m
.res2u3m
.resu1
kons2u3m
konsu1
opos2u3m
o1po1
oposu1
.bit2u3m
.bitu1
.kost2u3m
.kos1t
.kostu1
.zu3m
.zu1
.vi4a1
vi5a4n1d
vi3a1
vi5atik
viati1
.vi2c1
.vi3ca.
.vica1
.vi3c2aj.
.vi3c2a2jn.
.vica4j1n
.vi3c2an.
.vi3ce.
.vice1
.vi3co.
.vico1
.vi3c2oj.
.vi3c2o2jn.
.vico4j1n
.vi3c2on.
.vi3c2i3a1
.vi1ci1
.vi3c2i3o1
.vi2r1
vir2us
viru1
vi1r2ule4n1t
virule1
1a2fabl
afa1
1a2gra1
1a2per
ape1
1a2va1r
ava1
4ologi1
olo1
4ografi1
ogra1
2fik
fre2m4d3l
fre1
fre4m1d
4b1c
4b1b2
4b1d
4b1f
4b1g
4b1h4
4b1j2
4b1k
4b1m
4b1n
4b1p
4b1s
4b1s2k
4b1t
4b1v
4b1z
4b1ĉ
4b1ĝ
4b1ĵ
4b1ŝ
4c1b
4c1c2
4c1ĉ
4c1d
4c1f
4c1g
4c1ĝ
4c1h4
4c1j2
4c1ĵ
4c1k
4c1l
4c1m
4c1n
4c1p
4c1r
4c1s
4c1ŝ
4c1t
4c1v
4c1z
4ĉ1b
4ĉ1c
4ĉ1d
4ĉ1f
4ĉ1g
4ĉ1h4
4ĉ1k
4ĉ1l
4ĉ1m
4ĉ1n
4ĉ1p
4ĉ1s
4ĉ1t
4ĉ1v
4ĉ1z
4ĉ1ĉ
4ĉ1ĝ
4ĉ1ĵ
4ĉ1ŝ
4d1b
4d1c
4d1d2
4d1f
4d1g
4d1h4
4d1j2
4d1k
4d1l
4d1m
4d1n
4d1p
4d1s
4d1t
4d1v
4d1z
4d1ĉ
4d1ĝ
4d1ĵ
4d1ŝ
1e2ben
ebe1
1e4d2z
1e2gal
1e2le1g2a4n3t
elega1
4f1b
4f1c
4f1ĉ
4f1d
4f1f2
4f1g
4f1ĝ
4f1h4
4f1j2
4f1ĵ
4f1k
4f1m
4f1n
4f1p
4f1s
4f1ŝ
f1t
4f1v
4f1z
4g1b
4g1c
4g1ĉ
g1d
4g1f
4g1g2
4g1ĝ
4g1h4
4g1j2
4g1ĵ
4g1k
g1m
g1n
4g1p
4g1s
4g1ŝ
4g1t
g1v
4g1z
4ĝ1b
4ĝ1c
4ĝ1d
4ĝ1f
4ĝ1g
4ĝ1h4
4ĝ1j2
4ĝ1k
4ĝ1l
4ĝ1m
4ĝ1n
4ĝ1p
4ĝ1s
4ĝ1t
4ĝ1v
4ĝ1z
4ĝ1ĉ
4ĝ1ĝ
4ĝ1ĵ
4ĝ1ŝ
4h1ĉ
4h1ĝ
4h1ĵ
4h1ŝ
4ĥ1b
4ĥ1c
4ĥ1d
4ĥ1f
4ĥ1g
4ĥ1h4
4ĥ1j2
4ĥ1k
4ĥ1m
4ĥ1n
4ĥ1p
4ĥ1s
4ĥ1t
4ĥ1v
4ĥ1z
4ĥ1ĉ
4ĥ1ĝ
4ĥ1ĵ
4ĥ1ŝ
1i2de4n1t
4j1b
4j1c
4j1d
4j1f
4j1g
4j1h4
4j1k
4j1l
4j1m
4j1p
4j1r
4j1s
4j1t
4j1v
4j1z
4j1ĉ
4j1ĝ
4j1ĵ
4j1ŝ
4ĵ1b
4ĵ1c
4ĵ1d
4ĵ1f
4ĵ1g
4ĵ1h4
4ĵ1j2
4ĵ1k
4ĵ1l
4ĵ1m
4ĵ1n
4ĵ1p
4ĵ1s
4ĵ1t
4ĵ1v
4ĵ1z
4ĵ1ĉ
4ĵ1ĝ
4ĵ1ĵ
4ĵ1ŝ
4k1b
4k1c
4k1d
4k1f
4k1g
4k1h4
4k1j2
4k1m
4k1n
4k1p
4k1s
k1s2t2r
ks1t
4k1t
4k1z
4k1ĉ
4k1ĝ
4k1ĵ
4k1ŝ
4l1b
4l1c
4l1d
4l1f
4l1g
4l1h4
4l1j2
4l1k
4l1l2
4l1m
4l1n
4l1r
4l1s2
4l1v
4l1z
4l1ĉ
4l1ĝ
4l1ĵ
4l5ŝ2
4m1b
4m1c
4m1d
4m1f
4m1g
4m1h4
4m1j2
4m1k
4m1l
4m1m2
4m1n
4m1p
4m1r
4m1s
4m1t
4m1v
4m1z
4m1ĉ
4m1ĝ
4m1ĵ
4m1ŝ
mu4l2t1
mu1
mult2e1
mul2t3eg
mul3ta1
mul3te.
mul3to1
mul4t3obl
4n1b
4n1c
4n1d
4n1f
4n1g
4n1h4
n2k1v
4n1l
n1m
4n1n
4n1p
4n1r
n1s2c
n1s2t
4n1v2
4n1z
4n1ĉ
4n1ĝ
4n1ĵ
4n1ŝ
n4k1c
n2s1f
nor2d1af
no1
no4r1d
norda1
nor2d1am
nor2d1az
nor2d1e4ŭ1
norde1
nor2d1rus
nordru1
nor2d1ge4r1m
nor4d1g
nordge1
1o2be1
1o2kup
oku1
1o2por1tun
opo4r1t
oportu1
4p1b
4p1c
4p1d
4p1g
4p1h4
p1j2
p1k
p1m
p1n
p1s
4p1v
4p1z
4p1ĉ
4p1ĝ
4p1ĵ
p1ŝ
4r1b
4r1c
4r1d
4r1f
4r1g
4r1h4
4r1j2
4r1k
4r1l
4r1m
4r1n
4r1p
4r1s
4r1t
4r1v
4r1z
4r1ĉ
4r1ĝ
4r1ĵ
4r1ŝ
s1b
4s1ĉ
4s1d
s1f
s1g
4s1ĝ
4s1h4
4s1j2
4s1ĵ
3s2lab
sla1
3s2lalom
slalo1
3s2la4n1g
3s2lav
3s2led
sle1
3s2lip
sli1
3s2lo4j1d
3s2lovak
slova1
3s2loven
slove1
3s2lup
slu1
3s2lofo4k1s
slofo1
3s2ma4l1t
sma1
3s2mera4l1d
sme1
smera1
3s2milak
smi1
smila1
3s2mi4r1g
3s2mut
smu1
4s1n
3s2nob
sno1
3s2nuf
snu1
s1r
4s1s
4s1ŝ
1s2tu1d
stu1
4s1z
.su2d1af
.suda1
.su2d1am
.su2d1azi1
.su2d1eŭr
.sude1
.sude4ŭ1
.su2d1rus
.sudru1
4ŝ1b
4ŝ1c
4ŝ1d
4ŝ1f
4ŝ1g
4ŝ1h4
4ŝ1j2
4ŝ1k
ŝ1m
ŝ1n
ŝ1p
4ŝ1s
ŝ1t
ŝ1v
4ŝ1z
4ŝ1ĉ
4ŝ1ĝ
4ŝ1ĵ
4ŝ1ŝ
1ŝ2tel
ŝte1
4t1b
4t1c
4t1d
4t1f
4t1g
4t1h4
4t1j2
4t1k
4t1m
4t1n
4t1p
4t1s
4t1t
4t1v
4t1z
4t1ĉ
4t1ĝ
4t1ĵ
4t1ŝ
4ŭ1
ŭ2s1k
4v1b
4v1c
4v1d
4v1f
4v1g
4v1h4
4v1j2
4v1k
4v1l
4v1m
4v1n
4v1p
4v1s
4v1t
4v1v
4v1z
4v1ĉ
4v1ĝ
4v1ĵ
4v1ŝ
4z1b
4z1c
4z1d
4z1f
4z1g
4z1h4
4z1j2
4z1k
4z1l
z2lot
zlo1
4z1m
4z1n
4z1p
4z1r
4z1s
4z1t
4z1v
4z1ĉ
4z1ĝ
4z1ĵ
4z1ŝ
